Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB85.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 476. Distribution of SNAP Benefits.-- (a) Within one year of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop and implement guidelines that require each county assistance office to distribute SNAP benefits on a monthly basis using a uniform twenty-day distribution schedule. (b) The department may implement a tiered distribution schedule in order to deter any hardships as a result of the change in the distribution date under this section for an individual receiving the benefits.12345678910111213141516171819 (c) The guidelines under this section shall utilize a method which is uniform throughout this Commonwealth so that the distribution date for benefits does not change if an individual receiving benefits moves to a different county of residence in this Commonwealth, including using the first letter of the last name of an individual receiving benefits to set the date of distribution.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0085PN0040 - 2 - 12345678